Maryland, session 2025, SB0557.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – General
9–205.
(a) (1) The Comptroller may enter into reciprocal agreements on behalf of this
State, with the duly authorized representatives of any other state, that provide for:
(i) fuel tax registration of vehicles by motor carriers;
(ii) establishment of periodic fuel use reporting and fuel use tax
payment requirements by motor carriers; and
(iii) disbursement of money that is collected by the Comptroller and
is due to other states based on:
1. mileage travelled and fuel used in those states; and
2. the respective registration fees of those states.
(2) The Comptroller may not enter into any reciprocal agreement that
would affect:
(i) this State’s motor carrier tax rate; or
(ii) this State’s registration fee for motor carriers.
(b) In exercising the authority granted under subsection (a) of this section, the
Comptroller is expressly authorized to:
(1) enter into regional or national fuel use tax agreements;
(2) become a member of any regional or national conference, group,
compact, or similar organization of motor carrier fuel use tax administrators; and
(3) enforce the provisions set forth in any regional or national fuel use tax
agreements.
(c) The agreement provisions shall apply to the fuel use taxation, registration,
and reporting requirements of motor carriers subject to the provisions of the agreement
without reference to or application of any other statutes of this State.
SUBTITLE 4. VEHICLE–MILES–TRAVELED TAX – PROHIBITED.
9–401.

SENATE BILL 557 3
(A) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, THE STATE OR A LOCAL
JURISDICTION MAY NOT DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY, INCLUDING THROUGH A
THIRD–PARTY AGREEMENT OR AS PART OF A PILOT PROGRAM OR STUDY, IMPOSE OR
LEVY:
(1) A VEHICLE–MILES–TRAVELED TAX;
(2) A MILEAGE–BASED USER FEE;
(3) A TOLL BASED ON GLOBAL POSITIONING SATELLITE TRACKING;
OR
(4) ANY OTHER SIMILAR FORM OF TAX.
(B) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO PROHIBIT THE
COMPTROLLER FROM ENTERING INTO AND THE STATE FROM ENFORCING AN
AGREEMENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 9–205 OF THIS TITLE.
Article – Transportation
22–107.
THE STATE OR A LOCAL JURISDICTION MAY NOT REQUIRE THE INSTALLATION
OF A DEVICE IN OR ON A PRIVATELY OWNED VEHICLE TO FACILITATE THE
REPORTING OF THE NUMBER OF VEHICLE MILES TRAVELED.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.